Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-408
Intern Nebraska Cash Fund; created; use; investment; limit on expenditures for administrative services.

(1) The Intern Nebraska Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be used to carry out sections 81-409 to 81-411. The fund shall consist of money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The Department of Labor, or any entity with which the department contracts for such purpose, may use up to five percent of any appropriation to carry out sections 81-409 to 81-411 for administrative services.

Laws 2018, LB945, § 21;

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 175;

R.S.Supp.,2025, § 81-1210.04;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 28.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.